Maryland, session 2025, HB1400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) SECTION 14–1328 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1328.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FOOD SERVICE FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
21–301 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) “SERVICE FEE” MEANS A FEE ADDED BY A FOOD SERVICE
FACILITY TO A CUSTOMER’S TOTAL CHARGE THAT IS SEPARATE FROM:

HOUSE BILL 1400 3
(I) THE PRICE LISTED ON THE MENU FOR FOOD, DRINKS, OR
MERCHANDISE SOLD BY THE FOOD SERVICE FACILITY; AND
(II) ANY SALES TAX THE FOOD SERVICE FACILITY IS REQUIRED
TO COLLECT.
(B) A FOOD SERVICE FACILITY MAY NOT CHARGE A SERVICE FEE UNLESS
THE FOOD SERVICE FACILITY PROMINENTLY DISCLOSES TO THE CUSTOMER ON THE
MENU OR IN A LOCATION THAT IS VISIBLE TO THE CUSTOMER BEFORE THE
CUSTOMER PLACES AN ORDER:
(1) THE AMOUNT AND PURPOSE OF THE SERVICE FEE; AND
(2) WHETHER THE SERVICE FEE IS PAID DIRECTLY TO EMPLOYEES IN
ADDITION TO THEIR WAGES.
(C) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION BY A FOOD SERVICE FACILITY IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
Article – Labor and Employment
3–413.
(a) [(1)] In this section [the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Employer”], “EMPLOYER” includes a governmental unit.
[(3) “Small employer” means an employer that employs 14 or fewer
employees.]
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section and § 3–414 of this subtitle,
each employer shall pay:
(1) to each employee who is subject to both the federal Act and this subtitle,
at least the greater of:
(i) the minimum wage for that employee under the federal Act; or
(ii) the State minimum wage set under subsection (c) of this section;

HOUSE BILL 1400
and
(2) to each other employee who is subject to this subtitle, at least the
greater of:
(i) the highest minimum wage under the federal Act; or
(ii) the State minimum wage set under subsection (c) of this section.
(c) [(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the] THE State
minimum wage rate is:
[(i) for the 12–month period beginning January 1, 2023, $13.25 per
hour; and
(ii)] (1) FOR THE 36–MONTH PERIOD beginning January 1, 2024,
$15.00 per hour[.];
[(2) The State minimum wage rate for a small employer is:
(i) for the 12–month period beginning January 1, 2023, $12.80 per
hour; and
(ii) beginning January 1, 2024, $15.00 per hour.]
(2) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027,
$17.00 PER HOUR;
(3) FOR THE 6–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028, $18.50
PER HOUR; AND
(4) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, $20.00 PER HOUR.
(d) An employer may pay an employee a wage that equals a rate of 85% of the
State minimum wage established under this section if the employee is under the age of 18
years.
3–419.
(a) (1) Except as provided in § 3–1604(d) of this title, this section applies to
each employee who:
(i) is engaged in an occupation in which the employee customarily
and regularly receives more than $30 each month in tips;
(ii) has been informed by the employer about the provisions of this

HOUSE BILL 1400 5
section; and
(iii) has kept all of the tips that the employee received.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1)(iii) of this subsection, this section does
not prohibit the pooling of tips.
(b) Subject to the limitations in this section, an employer may include, as part of
the wage of an employee to whom this section applies:
(1) an amount that the employer sets to represent the tips of the employee;
or
(2) if the employee or representative of the employee satisfies the
Commissioner that the employee received a lesser amount in tips, the lesser amount.
(c) (1) The tip credit amount that the employer may include under subsection
(b) of this section may not exceed the minimum wage established under § 3–413 of this
subtitle for the employee less [$3.63]:
(I) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027,
$12.00; AND
(II) FOR THE 6–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028,
$13.50.
(2) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, AN EMPLOYER:
(I) MAY NOT INCLUDE A TIP CREDIT AS PART OF THE WAGE OF
AN EMPLOYEE SUBJECT TO THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) SHALL PAY AN EMPLOYEE A WAGE THAT IS AT LEAST EQUAL
TO THE STATE MINIMUM WAGE SET UNDER § 3–413 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED AS PROHIBITING THE
PAYMENT OF TIPS TO EMPLOYEES.
(d) (1) The Commissioner shall adopt regulations, in consultation with payroll
service providers and restaurant industry trade group representatives, to require
restaurant employers that include a tip credit as part of the wage of an employee to provide
tipped employees with a written or electronic wage statement for each pay period that
shows the effective hourly tip rate as derived from employer–paid cash wages plus all
reported tips for tip credit hours worked each workweek of the pay period.
(2) The Commissioner shall provide notification of the tip credit wage

HOUSE BILL 1400
statement regulations on the Department’s website.
Article – Tax – General
10–207.
(a) To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(QQ) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “EMPLOYMENT” MEANS WORK IN AN OCCUPATION OR
INDUSTRY IN WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL IS CUSTOMARILY COMPENSATED THROUGH A
COMBINATION OF WAGES AND TIPS, SUCH AS BARBERING, COSMETOLOGY,
HOSPITALITY, FOOD AND BEVERAGE SERVICE, PARKING SERVICES, AND CUSTODIAL
SERVICES.
(III) “QUALIFIED TIPS” MEANS TIPS RECEIVED BY AN
INDIVIDUAL DURING THE COURSE OF EMPLOYMENT THAT ARE PAID TO THE
INDIVIDUAL BY AN UNRELATED PARTY WHO DOES NOT HAVE AN OWNERSHIP STAKE
IN THE BUSINESS PROVIDING THE EMPLOYMENT.
(2) THE SUBTRACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
INCLUDES THE AMOUNT OF QUALIFIED TIPS RECEIVED BY AN INDIVIDUAL DURING
THE TAXABLE YEAR.
10–758.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, FOR A TAXABLE YEAR
BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2029, A PERSON
MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO
50% OF THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN:
(1) THE MINIMUM WAGE PAID TO AN EMPLOYEE OF THE PERSON IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–413 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE; AND
(2) THE TIP CREDIT AMOUNT ALLOWED UNDER § 3–419 OF THE
LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
(B) (1) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR, THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT
ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED:

HOUSE BILL 1400 7
(I) THE STATE INCOME TAX IMPOSED FOR THAT TAXABLE
YEAR; OR
(II) $10,000.
(2) ANY UNUSED AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR
MAY NOT BE CARRIED OVER TO ANY OTHER TAXABLE YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is contingent on the
passage of Chapter(s) ___(S.B. 809 or H.B. 1458) of the Acts of the General Assembly of
2025, a constitutional amendment, and its ratification by the voters of the State.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the Governor that the constitutional
amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast at the general election, has been
adopted by the people of Maryland.